Arkansas, session 2025, HB1090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Commerce - Arkansas Development Finance Authority for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U019U ACOM ADFA EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE03
(2) N024N ACOM DIRECTOR STUDENT LOAN AUTHORITY 1 GRADE SE01
(3) A146C ACOM ADFA BUSINESS FINANCE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(4) G321C ACOM ADFA LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS15
*MAH005*
01/06/2025 3:53:34 PM MAH005

HB1090
(5) N066N ACOM CHIEF COMM & LEGISLATIVE AFFAIRS 3 GRADE GS14
(6) A017N ACOM ADFA PUBLIC FINANCE OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(7) A007N ACOM ASLA FED PROGRAMS FINANCE OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(8) G027C ACOM ADFA PROGRAM OFFICER 9 GRADE GS12
(9) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(10) A031C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER 1 GRADE GS11
(11) A040C ACOM ADFA FISCAL PROGRAM MANAGER 4 GRADE GS10
(12) A051C ACOM ADFA FINANCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS09
(13) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 2 GRADE GS08
(14) A071C ACOM ADFA FINANCE PROGRAM ANALYST 4 GRADE GS08
(15) A022C STUDENT LOAN FINANCE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS08
(16) G173C ACOM ADFA PROGRAM COORDINATOR 7 GRADE GS07
(17) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 3 GRADE GS07
(18) A076C FINANCE PROGRAM ANALYST 1 GRADE GS07
(19) A080C ACOM FINANCE AUTHORITY SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS06
(20) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(21) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 55

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Commerce - Arkansas Development Finance Authority for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: five (5) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the cash funds as defined
by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services, operating expenses, data
processing services and grants and aid by of the Department of Commerce -
Arkansas Development Finance Authority for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
01/06/2025 3:53:34 PM MAH005

HB1090
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,545,109
(02) EXTRA HELP 40,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,195,812
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 611,458
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 60,000
(C) PROF. FEES 123,810
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 29,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 264,512
(06) HUD HOME PROGRAM 16,341,215
(07) FEDERAL HOUSING PROGRAMS 3,400,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $25,610,916

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - STUDENT LOAN AUTHORITY DIVISION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Development
Finance Authority - Student Loan Authority Division for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $381,135
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 119,227
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 125,312
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 13,972
(C) PROF. FEES 1,673,875
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,313,521

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - NATIONAL HOUSING TRUST FUND GRANT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Development
01/06/2025 3:53:34 PM MAH005

HB1090
Finance Authority, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses for implementation of the Federal Housing Program for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FEDERAL HOUSING PROGRAM $15,000,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - EMERGENCY SOLUTIONS GRANT. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Development Finance
Authority, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, to provide funding to engage homeless
individuals and families, improve the number and quality of emergency
shelters for homeless individuals and families, provide essential services to
shelter residents and rapidly re-house homeless individuals and families for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS AND AID $2,296,487

SECTION 7. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 8. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
01/06/2025 3:53:34 PM MAH005

HB1090
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.




















01/06/2025 3:53:34 PM MAH005